Hawaii statutes.
§149A-3 Delegation of duties. All
authority vested in the board or chairperson by virtue of this chapter may with
like force and effect be exercised by those employees of the department as the
board or chairperson may from time to time designate for the purpose. [L 1972,
c 58, pt of §1; ree L 1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 310, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next